Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1235
Payments; how treated.

No payment received by a displaced person pursuant to the Relocation Assistance Act shall be considered as income or resources for the purpose of determining the eligibility or extent of eligibility of any person for assistance under any state law or for the purposes of the state's income tax laws or other tax laws. Except in the case of payments received in conjunction with a low-income housing assistance program, such payments shall not be considered as income or resources of any recipient of public assistance and such payments shall not be deducted from the amount of aid to which the recipient would otherwise be entitled.

Laws 1989, LB 254, § 22.